Florida, session 2026, SB228.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âPresent subsection (6) of section 338.155, 20 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new 21 subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 22 338.155âPayment of toll on toll facilities required; 23 exemptions.â 24 (6)(a)âThe department shall establish a 2-year pilot 25 program that provides certified veteran business enterprises as 26 defined in s. 295.187(3) with a discount on business-related 27 toll expenses incurred on toll roads in this state. To be 28 eligible for the program, a certified veteran business 29 enterprise must demonstrate regular commercial use of toll roads 30 through automated toll accounts. 31 (b)âEligible businesses shall receive a 50 percent discount 32 on business-related toll expenses incurred on toll roads in this 33 state by registered commercial vehicles used for business 34 operations. 35 (c)âThe Florida Turnpike Enterprise shall administer the 36 pilot program in coordination with the Department of Veteransâ 37 Affairs and the Department of Management Services. 38 (d)âCertified veteran business enterprises must apply 39 annually and provide proof of veteran ownership and toll usage. 40 (e)âDiscounts shall be applied through automated toll 41 accounts. 42 (f)âThe department shall review the pilot program and 43 submit an impact report containing its findings to the President 44 of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 45 July 1, 2027. The report must assess participation rates and 46 fiscal impact and provide recommendations for continuation or 47 expansion of the program. 48 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.